Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3,102
Plate fee.

(1) Whenever new license plates, including duplicate or replacement license plates, are issued to any person, a fee per plate shall be charged in addition to all other required fees. The license plate fee shall be determined by the department and shall only cover the cost of the license plate and validation decals but shall not exceed eight dollars.

(2) All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Trust Fund. Beginning with the 2029 license plate issuance cycle, all fees collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the License Plate Cash Fund.

(3) This section shall not apply to license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,122, 60-3,122.02, 60-3,123, 60-3,124, or 60-3,125.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 102;

Laws 2019, LB138, § 7;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 17;

Laws 2025, LB97, § 22.